Arkansas, session 2025, HB1283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 16, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-16-163. Digital media standards — Required — Definitions.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) There is an urgent need to address the potentially harmful
effects of social media on children and adults; and
(2) It is crucial that the General Assembly establish a means by
which students in the State of Arkansas can learn to be digitally literate
and responsible in order to protect against the potentially harmful effects
of social media.
(b) As used in this section:
(1)(A) "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system
that can make decisions, recommendations, or predictions based on a set of
*TNL124*
02-27-2025 10:44:25 TNL124

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1283
objectives.
(B) "Artificial intelligence" includes a machine-based
system that uses human and machine inputs in order to perceive environments,
analyze environments, and formulate opinions;
(2) "Digital citizenship" means the application of the standards
of appropriate, responsible, and healthy online behavior, including the
ability to access, analyze, evaluate, create, and act on all forms of digital
communication;
(3) "Digital wellness" means the physical and emotional health
impacts of media use, with attention to the development of conscious,
balanced usage of media that aligns with an individual's goals for his or her
health and well-being;
(4)(A) "Information literacy" means a subdomain of media
literacy that ensures an individual is able to recognize when information is
needed and locate, evaluate, and effectively utilize the needed information.
(B) "Information literacy" includes learning to ask
questions regarding whether a source is legitimate and appropriate based on
the information that is needed;
(5)(A) "Media literacy" means the ability to:
(i) Decode media messages, including the systems in
which media messages exist;
(ii) Assess the influence of media messages on
thoughts, feelings, behaviors, perceptions, beliefs, health, and society; and
(iii) Use and create media messages to provide
information, send a message, or tell a story in a way that is thoughtful,
conscientious, safe, and responsible.
(B) "Media literacy" includes digital citizenship, digital
wellness, information literacy, news literacy, and social media literacy;
(6)(A) "News literacy" means a subdomain of media literacy that
emphasizes knowledge of journalistic practices and the news media industry.
(B) "News literacy" includes the ability to determine the
credibility and reliability of news and other information and to recognize
the standards of fact-based journalism to know what to trust, share, and act
on; and
(7) "Social media literacy" means the application of digital
citizenship and digital wellness to address physical and mental health
02-27-2025 10:44:25 TNL124

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1283
implications of social media use, including positive and negative mental and
emotional health implications of viewing certain social media content and all
aspects of safety and wellness related to the use of social media.
(c) By the 2026-2027 school year, the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education shall revise the kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12)
library media standards to include digital media standards.
(d) The digital media standards required under this section shall
include instruction on:
(1) Digital citizenship, including media literacy instruction,
internet safety instruction, and artificial intelligence usage instruction;
(2) Digital wellness, including without limitation information
on the:
(A) Positive effects of social media, including
communicating, researching, and collaborating with others and building
businesses and relationships;
(B) Negative effects of social media on mental health,
including without limitation addiction to social media;
(C) Potential of social media to manipulate behavior; and
(D) Permanency of sharing materials and information
online;
(3) Internet safety, including best practices to:
(A) Maintain personal security; and
(B) Identify cyberbullying, predatory behavior,
cybersecurity, and human trafficking on the internet;
(4) Social media literacy; and
(5) The proper use of artificial intelligence.
(e) The division shall:
(1) Identify and curate resources for parents and legal
guardians, educators, and students that support the implementation of
kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) digital media standards required
under this section; and
(2) Ensure digital media standards required under this section
are age-appropriate and progressively build on prior knowledge of digital
media standards.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-25-103(a)(1), concerning the job duty of
02-27-2025 10:44:25 TNL124

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1283
a library media specialist to serve as an information specialist, is amended
to read as follows:
(1) An information specialist whose primary job function is to:
(A) Provide resources available to patrons through a
systematically developed collection within the school and through access to
resources outside the school;
(B) Provide assistance to patrons in identifying,
locating, and interpreting information housed in and outside the library
media center;
(C) Provide learning opportunities related to new
technologies, use, and production of a variety of media formats; and
(D)(i) Provide instruction in the use of the library media
center standards, which shall include information literacy and digital media
literacy as required under § 6-16-163.
(ii) Elementary class Class sessions for a library
media specialist shall be limited as provided under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section.
(iii) Library media standards shall be taught in
collaboration with content-area and classroom teachers;


/s/J. Mayberry














02-27-2025 10:44:25 TNL124